Rhode Island statutes. Title 21 Food and Drugs
Chapter 19 Potatoes

21-19-1.
Definitions.

“Grade” or “grades” means the standards for potatoes established by the United States Department of Agriculture and promulgated by the director of environmental management as the official grades of potatoes for Rhode Island under the authority of §

21-20-5

.

“Person” or “persons” as used in this chapter includes individuals, corporations, companies, societies, and associations. The act, omission, or failure of an officer, agent, or other person acting for or employed by a corporation, company, society, or association, within the scope of that person’s employment or office shall also be deemed to be the act, omission, or failure of the corporation, company, society, or association.

“Plainly and conspicuously” means that the lettering used to convey information required by law on containers shall be legible enough so as not to be obscured by other markings or illustrations used. Grade terms shall be in block letters three-eighths inch (3/8") or larger in height.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2552, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

21-19-1

.

21-19-2.
Scope of chapter.

The provisions of this chapter shall apply to all shipments, packages, containers, or displays in which potatoes are packed, distributed, sold, or offered or exposed for sale except as otherwise provided in this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2552, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

21-19-2

.

21-19-3.
Grades.

The United States grades for potatoes as promulgated by the United States Department of Agriculture are made the official grades for purposes of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2552, § 9; G.L. 1956, §

21-19-3

.

21-19-4.
Marking of containers and display racks and bins.

Every shipment, package, or container, containing potatoes which are packed, sold, distributed, or offered or exposed for sale or distribution in the state by any person shall be plainly and conspicuously marked with the name and address of the packer, or the person by whose authority the potatoes are packed or distributed, the net weight, and the proper grade of the potatoes contained in it. The party possessing the potatoes at any time shall be deemed responsible for the proper marking of the potatoes. On display racks or bins from which potatoes are sold in retail quantities, the proper grade must be plainly and conspicuously shown, but the provisions as to markings of name and address of the person by whose authority the potatoes were packed shall not apply.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2552, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

21-19-4

.

21-19-5.
Potatoes exempt from chapter.

All potatoes intended for sale to a processing plant or to a first receiver who normally grades them into proper grades before reselling them shall be exempt from the provisions of this chapter until they are offered for resale. All ungraded potatoes shipped under this provision must be in turned sacks, in plain paper bags, or in bulk. Properly tagged certified seed potatoes are exempted from these provisions.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2552, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

21-19-5

.

21-19-6.
Advertising.

All radio, newspaper, or display advertising of potatoes must state the grade or grades of potatoes being advertised.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2552, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

21-19-6

.

21-19-7.
Enforcement — Appropriations and disbursements.

The director of environmental management shall administer and enforce the provisions of this chapter and shall make suitable regulations to carry out the administration and enforcement. The general assembly shall annually appropriate any sum that it may deem necessary to carry out the purpose of this chapter; and the state controller is authorized and directed to draw orders upon the general treasurer for the payment of that sum, or so much of it as may be required from time to time, upon receipt by the controller of properly authenticated vouchers.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2552, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

21-19-7

; impl. am. P.L. 1965, ch. 137, § 1.

21-19-8.
Hearings on violations.

When the director of environmental management learns of any violation of any provisions of this chapter, he or she may cause notice of the violation, together with the copy of his or her findings, to be given to the person or persons concerned. Persons notified may be given a hearing under rules and regulations prescribed by the director. Notice of the hearings shall declare the date, hour, and place of the hearing.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2552, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

21-19-8

; impl. am. P.L. 1965, ch. 137, § 1.

21-19-9.
Penalties for violations.

Any person, firm, or corporation, which by itself or its agents or employees, violates any provisions of this chapter, or any regulation made under this chapter, or fails to comply with any of the requirements of this chapter or knowingly misrepresents the grade of any potatoes, shall be fined not more than fifty dollars ($50.00) nor less than twenty-five dollars ($25.00) for the first offense and not more than two hundred dollars ($200) nor less than fifty dollars ($50.00) for each subsequent offense.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2552, § 8; G.L. 1956, §

21-19-9

.